fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-1-asikan_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - asikan - ok : # -m anate noun, sock AEW NA1
     asikan+N+A+Sg: asikan
     asikan+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nitasikan
     asikan+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: kitasikan
     asikan+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nitasikaninân
     asikan+N+A+Px21Pl+Sg: kitasikaninaw
     asikan+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: kitasikaniwâw

     asikan+N+A+Pl: asikanak
     asikan+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nitasikanak
     asikan+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: kitasikanak
     asikan+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: nitasikaninânak
     asikan+N+A+Px21Pl+Pl: kitasikaninawak
     asikan+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: kitasikaniwâwak
     
     asikan+N+A+Obv: asikana
     asikan+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: nitasikana
     asikan+N+A+Px2Sg+Obv: kitasikana
     asikan+N+A+Px1Pl+Obv: nitasikaninâna
     asikan+N+A+Px21Pl+Obv: kitasikaninawa
     asikan+N+A+Px2Pl+Obv: kitasikaniwâwa
     asikan+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: otasikana
     asikan+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: otasikaniwâwa
     asikan+N+A+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: otasikaniyiwa
     
     asikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [asikanis, asikanisis]
     asikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: [nicasikanis, nicasikanisis]
     asikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: [kicasikanis, kicasikanisis]
     asikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: [nicasikanisinân, nicasikanisisinân]
     asikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px21Pl+Sg: [kicasikanisinaw, kicasikanisisinaw]
     asikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: [kicasikanisiwâw, kicasikanisisiwâw]

     asikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Pl: [asikanisak, asikanisisak]
     asikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: [nicasikanisak, nicasikanisisak]
     asikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: [kicasikanisak, kicasikanisisak]
     asikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: [nicasikanisinânak, nicasikanisisinânak]
     asikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px21Pl+Pl: [kicasikanisinawak, kicasikanisisinawak]
     asikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: [kicasikanisiwâwak, kicasikanisisiwâwak]
     
     asikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: [ocasikanisa, ocasikanisisa]
     asikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: [ocasikanisiwâwa, ocasikanisisiwâwa]
     asikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: [ocasikanisiyiwa, ocasikanisisiyiwa]
